District of Columbia statutes.
31-3171.14

Powers of the Mayor.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, all powers and authority vested by this chapter in the Authority shall remain with the Mayor until:

(1)

A majority of members of the executive board have been confirmed by the Council; and

(2)

The executive board has hired an executive director.

Mar. 2, 2012, D.C. Law 19-94, § 15, 59 DCR 213